incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
    <pardef n="teampa/ll__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ainm/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neacha</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neacha</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neacha</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neacha</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ca/rr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rranna</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rranna</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rranna</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rranna</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ath/air__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reacha</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reacha</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reacha</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reacha</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="máth/air__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reacha</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reacha</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reacha</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reacha</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="urlá/r__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ac__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ic</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ic</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ic</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aca</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ic</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="teampall"><par n="t_init"/><i>eampa</i><par n="teampa/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ainm"><par n="a_init"/><i>inm</i><par n="ainm/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carr"><par n="c_init"/><i>a</i><par n="ca/rr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athair"><par n="a_init"/><i>th</i><par n="ath/air__n"/></e>
    <e lm="máthair"><par n="m_init"/><i>áth</i><par n="máth/air__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aerchór"><par n="a_init"/><i>erchó</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ainmchlár"><par n="a_init"/><i>inmchlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amhábhar"><par n="a_init"/><i>mhábha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ardchlár"><par n="a_init"/><i>rdchlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athchur"><par n="a_init"/><i>thchu</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bar"><par n="b_init"/><i>a</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biachlár"><par n="b_init"/><i>iachlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bleadar"><par n="b_init"/><i>leada</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="branar"><par n="b_init"/><i>rana</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bruscar"><par n="b_init"/><i>rusca</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bunúdar"><par n="b_init"/><i>unúda</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caileandar"><par n="c_init"/><i>aileanda</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="camruathar"><par n="c_init"/><i>amruatha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceáfar"><par n="c_init"/><i>eáfa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciarsúr"><par n="c_init"/><i>iarsú</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clabhsúr"><par n="c_init"/><i>labhsú</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clochar"><par n="c_init"/><i>locha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coiriandar"><par n="c_init"/><i>oirianda</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="conamar"><par n="c_init"/><i>onama</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="creabhar"><par n="c_init"/><i>reabha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cuitéar"><par n="c_init"/><i>uitéa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deiciméadar"><par n="d_init"/><i>eiciméada</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dríodar"><par n="d_init"/><i>ríoda</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="féimear"><par n="f_init"/><i>éimea</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forchur"><par n="f_init"/><i>orchu</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gadhar"><par n="g_init"/><i>adha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="géasar"><par n="g_init"/><i>éasa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grabhar"><par n="g_init"/><i>rabha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iarthar"><par n="i_init"/><i>artha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="labhandar"><i>labhanda</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="léamar"><i>léama</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liobar"><i>lioba</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maighnéadaiméadar"><par n="m_init"/><i>aighnéadaiméada</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meánlár"><par n="m_init"/><i>eánlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moirtéar"><par n="m_init"/><i>oirtéa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neachtar"><i>neachta</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="par"><par n="p_init"/><i>a</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plódcheantar"><par n="p_init"/><i>lódcheanta</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="quizchlár"><i>quizchlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rómhar"><i>rómha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sapar"><par n="s_init"/><i>apa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scúnar"><par n="s_init"/><i>cúna</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="simeatár"><par n="s_init"/><i>imeatá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smúr"><par n="s_init"/><i>mú</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spáinnéar"><par n="s_init"/><i>páinnéa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="steotar"><par n="s_init"/><i>teota</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tambór"><par n="t_init"/><i>ambó</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tintiúr"><par n="t_init"/><i>intiú</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tráthchlár"><par n="t_init"/><i>ráthchlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umar"><par n="u_init"/><i>ma</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
